Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5094.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 107. (1) The industrial hemp fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The Subject to subsection (6), the state treasurer may receive the fees collected under section 511 for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer may also receive money or other assets from any other source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund to establish, operate, and enforce the program. (6) On October 1, 2026, the industrial hemp fund is abolished and any unencumbered balance in the industrial hemp fund at that time must be transferred to the agriculture licensing and inspection fees fund created in section 9 of the insect pest and plant disease act, 1931 PA 189, MCL 286.209. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect February 1, 2026.